Missouri, session 2026, HB2953.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 304.281, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 304.281, to read as follows:
304.281. 1. Whenever traffic is controlled by traffic control signals exhibiting
different colored lights, or colored lighted arrows, successively one at a time or in
combination, only the colors green, red and yellow shall be used, except for special pedestrian
signals carrying a word legend, and said lights shall indicate and apply to drivers of vehicles
and pedestrians as follows:
(1) Green indication
(a) Vehicular traffic facing a circular green signal may proceed straight through or
turn right or left unless a sign at such place prohibits either such turn. But vehicular traffic,
including vehicles turning right or left, shall yield the right-of-way to other vehicles and to
pedestrians lawfully within the intersection or an adjacent crosswalk at the time such signal is
exhibited;
(b) Vehicular traffic facing a green arrow signal, shown alone or in combination with
another indication, may cautiously enter the intersection only to make the movement
indicated by such arrow, or such other movement as is permitted by other indications shown
at the same time. Such vehicular traffic shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians lawfully
within an adjacent crosswalk and to other traffic lawfully using the intersection;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2953 2
(c) Unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian control signal, as provided in section
304.291, pedestrians facing any green signal, except when the sole green signal is a turn
arrow, may proceed across the roadway within any marked or unmarked crosswalk.
(2) Steady yellow indication
(a) Vehicular traffic facing a steady yellow signal is thereby warned that the related
green movement is being terminated or that a red indication will be exhibited immediately
thereafter when vehicular traffic shall not enter the intersection;
(b) Pedestrians facing a steady yellow signal, unless otherwise directed by a
pedestrian control signal as provided in section 304.291, are thereby advised that there is
insufficient time to cross the roadway before a red indication is shown and no pedestrian shall
then start to cross the roadway.
(3) Steady red indication
(a) Vehicular traffic facing a steady red signal alone shall stop before entering the
crosswalk on the near side of the intersection at a clearly marked stop line but, if none, then
before entering the intersection and shall remain standing until an indication to proceed is
shown except as provided in paragraph (b);
(b) The driver of a vehicle which is stopped as close as practicable at the entrance to
the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or, if none, then at the entrance to the
intersection in obedience to a red signal, may cautiously enter the intersection to make a right
turn but shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians and other traffic proceeding as directed by
the signal at the intersection, except that the state highways and transportation commission
with reference to an intersection involving a state highway, and local authorities with
reference to an intersection involving other highways under their jurisdiction, may prohibit
any such right turn against a red signal at any intersection where safety conditions so require,
said prohibition shall be effective when a sign is erected at such intersection giving notice
thereof;
(c) Unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian control signal as provided in section
304.291, pedestrians facing a steady red signal alone shall not enter the roadway.
(4) In the event an official traffic control signal is erected and maintained at a place
other than an intersection, the provision of this section shall be applicable except as to those
provisions which by their nature can have no application. Any stop required shall be made at
a sign or marking on the pavement indicating where the stop shall be made, but in the absence
of any such sign or marking the stop shall be made at the signal.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 304.361, violation of this section is a
[class C] class B misdemeanor, except that violation of this section shall be a class A

HB 2953 3
misdemeanor when a pedestrian is struck by a vehicle operated in violation of this
section.
✔